Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2,165.02
Beekeeping; legislative intent; responsibility for education.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the department is not responsible for education regarding good beekeeping practices and education intended to aid in the protection of the apicultural interests in the state from bee diseases, parasites, or pests.

It is further the intent of the Legislature that the University of Nebraska provide such education in accordance with the transfer of appropriations to the university for this purpose.

Laws 1994, LB 1071, § 1.